apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.ca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
<sdef n="unc"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<!--Paradigmes NOMS -->


 <pardef n="am/én__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>én</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="du/c__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quesses</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quessa</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cs</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="meg/a__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guardaespatlles__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="biòl/eg__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogues</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oga</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egs</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>eg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="ultras/ò__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ò<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ò</l>
          <r>ò<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nitr/ogen__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ògens</l>
          <r>ogen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>ogen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="p/ol·len__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òl·lens</l>
          <r>ol·len<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol·len</l>
          <r>ol·len<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bar/ó__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onesses</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onessa</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="mag__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="calç__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  <pardef n="abell/a__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="boc/í__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>í<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="aband/ó__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="rebaixa"><i>rebaix</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="turó"><i>tur</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="gorja"><i>gorj</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="querubí"><i>querub</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="queló"><i>quel</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="infrasò"><i>infras</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="pol·len"><i>p</i><par n="p/ol·len__n"/></e>
<e lm="baró"><i>bar</i><par n="bar/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="limonita"><i>limonit</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="semitò"><i>semit</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="urobilinogen"><i>urobilin</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="al·luvió"><i>al·luvi</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="mag"><i>mag</i><par n="mag__n"/></e>
<e lm="ignomínia"><i>ignomíni</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="pergamí"><i>pergam</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="col·luvió"><i>col·luvi</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="amén"><i>am</i><par n="am/én__n"/></e>
<e lm="duc"><i>du</i><par n="du/c__n"/></e>
<e lm="pneumatomediastí"><i>pneumatomediast</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="euga"><i>eug</i><par n="meg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="tetina"><i>tetin</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiperó"><i>hiper</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="busca-raons"><i>busca-raons</i><par n="guardaespatlles__n"/></e>
<e lm="zimogen"><i>zim</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="clarí"><i>clar</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="eurobò"><i>eurob</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="sobretò"><i>sobret</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="nunciatura"><i>nunciatur</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="abandó"><i>aband</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="nyicris"><i>nyicris</i><par n="guardaespatlles__n"/></e>
<e lm="parahidrogen"><i>parahidr</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="serafí"><i>seraf</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="carmí"><i>carm</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="interferó"><i>interfer</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="parestèsia"><i>parestèsi</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="sermó"><i>serm</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="caçatalents"><i>caçatalents</i><par n="guardaespatlles__n"/></e>
<e lm="al·lergogen"><i>al·lerg</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="isotrò"><i>isotr</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="hepatitis"><i>hepatitis</i><par n="calç__n"/></e>
<e lm="càries"><i>càries</i><par n="calç__n"/></e>
<e lm="bitò"><i>bit</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="actinometria"><i>actinometri</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ultrasò"><i>ultras</i><par n="ultras/ò__n"/></e>
<e lm="dial·laga"><i>dial·lag</i><par n="meg/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="glicogen"><i>glic</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="garrí"><i>garr</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="halogen"><i>hal</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="hidrogen"><i>hidr</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="cininogen"><i>cinin</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="gravitó"><i>gravit</i><par n="aband/ó__n"/></e>
<e lm="rabí"><i>rab</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="trampolí"><i>trampol</i><par n="boc/í__n"/></e>
<e lm="tos"><i>tos</i><par n="calç__n"/></e>
<e lm="ortohidrogen"><i>ortohidr</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="fibrinogen"><i>fibrin</i><par n="nitr/ogen__n"/></e>
<e lm="flotilla"><i>flotill</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="astròleg"><i>astròl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="hepatòleg"><i>hepatòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="ictiòleg"><i>ictiòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="embriòleg"><i>embriòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="arqueòleg"><i>arqueòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="monòleg"><i>monòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="bacteriòleg"><i>bacteriòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="citòleg"><i>citòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="farmacòleg"><i>farmacòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
<e lm="radiòleg"><i>radiòl</i><par n="biòl/eg__n"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
